Nebraska statutes.
Section 1.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-758
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Quality Education Accountability Act:

(1) Assessment means the process of measuring student achievement and progress on state-adopted standards;

(2) Assessment instrument means a test aligned with state standards that is designed to measure student progress and achievement; and

(3) National assessment instrument means a nationally norm-referenced test developed and scored by a national testing service.

Laws 2007, LB653, § 2;

Laws 2008, LB1157, § 1.